Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 19 Animal Care

4-19-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is:

To protect the owners of dogs and cats from the sale or use of stolen pets;

To ensure that all warm-blooded, vertebrate animals, in the care of facilities licensed or registered under this chapter, are provided humane care and treatment by regulating the transportation, sale, purchase, housing, care, handling, and treatment of these animals by persons or organizations engaged in transporting, selling, handling, housing, and care of these animals;

To ensure that animals confined in pet shops, kennels, animal shelters, auction markets, breeding facilities, training facilities with the exception of training facilities maintained by government agencies and training facilities operated by volunteers working for a not-for-profit or exempt nonprofit organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and pounds are provided humane care and treatment;

To release for sale, trade, or adoption only those animals that appear to be free of infection, communicable disease, or abnormalities, unless veterinary care subsequent to release is assured;

To ensure the spaying and neutering of dogs and cats that are adopted from a releasing agency;

To increase transparency concerning where pet shops source dogs and cats; and

To ensure pet shops can also source puppies and kittens from rescues and shelters to help provide homes for puppies and kittens in need.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 475, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 252, § 1.

4-19-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, chapter 13 of this title, and the regulations promulgated under this chapter:

“Adequate feed” means the provision at suitable intervals, not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, of a quantity of wholesome foodstuff suitable for the species and age, sufficient to maintain a reasonable level of nutrition in each animal. The foodstuff shall be served in a sanitized receptacle, dish, or container.

“Adequate veterinary care” means care by a licensed veterinarian sufficient to prevent the animal from experiencing unnecessary or unjustified physical pain or suffering.

“Adequate water” means a constant access to a sufficient supply of clean, fresh, potable water provided in a sanitary manner and provided at suitable intervals for the species to maintain the health of the animal(s) and not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours at any interval.

“Adopt” means when an adopting party voluntarily acquires and assumes responsibility for an animal from a releasing agency that is properly licensed or registered by the department.

“Adopting party” means any person who enters into a contract acquiring an animal from a releasing agency that is properly licensed or registered by the department.

“Ambient temperature” means the temperature surrounding the animal.

“Animal” means any dog or cat, rabbit, rodent, nonhuman primate, bird or other warm-blooded vertebrate, amphibian, fish, or reptile but shall not include horses, cattle, sheep, goats, swine, and domestic fowl.

“Animal rescue” or “rescue” means an entity, without a physical brick-and-mortar facility, that is owned, operated, or maintained by a duly incorporated humane society, animal welfare society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or other nonprofit organization devoted to the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of animals intended for adoption.

“Animal shelter” means a brick-and-mortar facility that is used to house or contain animals and that is owned, operated, or maintained by a duly incorporated humane society, animal welfare society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or other nonprofit organization devoted to the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of animals.

“Breeder” means a person engaged in the propagation of purebred or crossbred dogs and/or cats for the purpose of improving and enhancing a breed recognized and registered by the American Kennel Club, American Field Stud Book, a registered cat breed association, or for sale at wholesale or retail, unless otherwise exempted as a hobby breeder as defined below.

“Broker” means any third party who arranges, delivers, or otherwise facilitates transfer of ownership of animal(s), through adoption or fostering, from one party to another, whether or not the party receives a fee for providing that service and whether or not the party takes physical possession of the animal(s) at any point.

“Dealer” means any person who sells, exchanges, or donates, or offers to sell, exchange, or donate, animals to another dealer, pet shop, or research facility, or who breeds animals for the purpose of selling or donating to another dealer or pet shop or research facility.

“Director” means the director of environmental management of the state of Rhode Island.

“Dog officer” or “animal-control officer” means any person employed, contracted, or appointed by the state, or any political subdivision of the state, for the purpose of aiding in the enforcement of this chapter or any other law or ordinance relating to the licensing of dogs, cats, or other animals; the control of dogs, cats, or other animals; or the seizure and impoundment of dogs, cats, or other animals and includes any state or municipal peace officer, animal-control officer, sheriff, constable, or other employee whose duties, in whole or in part, include assignments that involve the seizure or taking into custody of any dog, cat, or other animal.

“Euthanasia” means the humane destruction of an animal accomplished by a method that involves instantaneous unconsciousness and immediate death or by a method that involves anesthesia, produced by an agent that causes painless loss of consciousness and death during that loss of consciousness.

“Guardian” shall mean a person(s) having the same rights and responsibilities of an owner, and both terms shall be used interchangeably. A guardian shall also mean a person who possesses, has title to or an interest in, harbors, or has control, custody, or possession of an animal and who is responsible for an animal’s safety and well-being.

“Hobby breeder” means those persons whose regular occupation is not the breeding and raising of dogs and cats and whose method of sale is at retail only. A hobby breeder shall not exceed the limits set forth in §

4-25-1(4)

. Any person who sells at retail a number in excess of the limits in the aforementioned section shall be considered a breeder.

“Housing facility” means any room, building, or area used to contain a primary enclosure or enclosures.

“Kennel” means a place or establishment, other than a pound or animal shelter, or veterinary hospital that is housing animals during their treatment, where animals not owned by the proprietor are sheltered, fed, and watered in return for a fee. This definition shall not apply to the following:

Sheltering, feeding, and watering in return for a fee in a residential setting, of no more than four (4) animals not owned by the proprietor, subject to any applicable municipal ordinance that may be more restrictive;

Any entity that sells a dog or cat.

“Licensed releasing agency” means any animal shelter, animal-rescue, pound, animal-control officer, or broker that is required to be licensed or registered with the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and is so licensed or registered.

“Neuter” means to surgically render a male dog or cat unable to reproduce.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, joint stock company, corporation, association, trust, estate, or other legal entity.

“Pet shop” means an establishment where animals are bought, sold, exchanged, or offered for sale or exchange to the general public at retail. This shall not include an establishment or person whose total sales are the offspring of canine or feline females maintained on their premises and sold from those premises and does not exceed the limits set forth in §

4-25-1(4)

.

“Pound” or “dog pound” means a facility operated by a state, or any political subdivision of a state, for the purpose of impounding or harboring seized, stray, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted dogs, cats, and other animals or a facility operated for that purpose under a contract with any municipal corporation or incorporated society for the prevention of cruelty to animals.

“Primary enclosure” or “enclosure” means the most proximal barrier to an animal that will have the intended purpose or effect of containment of that animal or that will effectively restrict the liberty of the animal.

“Public auction” means any place or location where dogs or cats are sold at auction to the highest bidder regardless of whether those dogs or cats are offered as individuals, as a group, or by weight.

“Research facility” means any place, laboratory, or institution at which scientific tests, investigations, or experiments involving the use of living animals are carried out, conducted, or attempted.

“Sanitize” means to make physically clean and to remove and destroy, to a practical minimum, agents injurious to health.

“Sexual maturity” means when a dog or cat reaches six (6) months. In all instances, the licensed releasing agency or a licensed veterinarian will determine the age of the dog or cat.

“Spay” means to surgically render a female dog or cat unable to reproduce.

“State veterinarian” means a licensed veterinarian from the department of environmental management.

“Trainer” means those persons who actively engage in the application of behavior analysis using the environmental events of antecedents and consequences to modify the behavior of an animal, either for the animal to assist in specific activities or undertake particular tasks, or for the animal to participate effectively in contemporary domestic life, and who keep, board, or retain possession of the animal for at least one overnight period, with the exception of those persons engaged in these activities for dog training programs operated by government agencies and for dog training programs operated by a not-for-profit or exempt nonprofit organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 10; P.L. 2012, ch. 301, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 358, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 475, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 252, § 1.

4-19-3.
Registration of municipal dog pounds.

No municipality shall operate a dog pound unless a certificate of registration for that dog pound has been granted by the director. Application for that certificate shall be made in the manner provided by the director. No fee is required for the application or certificate. Certificates of registration are valid for a period of one year or until revoked and may be renewed annually on the first day of January for like periods upon application in the manner provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 2.

4-19-4.
Registration of animal shelters, rescues, and brokers.

No person shall operate an animal shelter, rescue, or as a broker unless a certificate of registration for that animal shelter, rescue, or broker has been granted by the director. Application for that certificate shall be made in the manner provided by the director. No fee is required for the application or certificate. Certificates of registration are valid for a period of one year, or until revoked, and may be renewed annually on the first day of January for like periods upon application in the manner provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1.

4-19-4.1.
Sales by pet shops.

A pet shop shall send the following records to the department of environmental management on or before May 1 and November 1 of every year, documenting the following for each dog or cat offered for sale during the previous six (6) months:

A health certificate signed by a licensed veterinarian that indicates that the dog or cat was examined and in good health seven (7) days after the dog or cat was acquired by the pet shop;

Original source information including:

The name, business name, if applicable, street address, city, and state of the breeder;

Any applicable federal and state license number for the breeder;

Any federal and state inspection reports the breeder received in the previous six (6) months, without redactions, unless the reports are unavailable because the breeder had not been inspected by federal or state agencies in the previous six (6) months;

The total number of dogs and cats on the premises of the breeder at the time the dog or cat offered for sale by the pet shop left the breeder’s premises;

Broker or dealer information, if applicable, including:

The name, business name, if applicable, street address, city, and state of the broker or dealer who obtained the dog or cat from the breeder and resold the dog or cat to the pet shop;

Any applicable federal and state license number for the broker or dealer who sold the dog or cat to the pet shop;

Any federal and state inspection reports the broker or dealer received in the previous six (6) months, without redactions, unless such reports are unavailable because the broker or dealer has not been inspected by federal or state agencies in the previous six (6) months.

A pet shop shall post on the enclosure of each dog and cat offered for sale:

The breed, age, and date of birth of the dog or cat;

The information required under subsection (a) of this section.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to any dog or cat obtained from an animal rescue, shelter, or dog pound.

For those dogs or cats obtained from an animal rescue, shelter, or dog pound, a pet shop must post on each enclosure the name and address of the animal rescue, animal shelter, or dog pound, and the organization’s federal tax identification number, if applicable.

A pet shop owner or operator who violates any provision of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first offense, by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300) for a second offense, and a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for a third or subsequent offense. Each failure to report or post in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 2.

4-19-4.2.
Prohibition on sales in public places.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, exchange, trade, barter, lease, or display for a commercial purpose any dog or cat on any roadside, public right-of-way, parkway, median, park, other recreation area, flea market or other outdoor market, or commercial or retail parking lot regardless of whether such access is authorized.

This section shall not apply to the following:

The display or adoption of dogs or cats by an animal shelter, pound, or rescue as defined in this chapter; or

The display of dogs or cats as part of a state or county fair exhibition, 4-H program, or similar exhibitions or educational programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 2.

4-19-5.
Pet shop licenses.

No person shall operate a pet shop, as defined in this chapter, unless a license to operate that establishment shall have been granted by the director. Application for that license shall be made in the manner provided by the director. The license period is the state’s fiscal year and the license fee is one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each license period or part thereof beginning with the first day of the fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 33, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1.

4-19-5.1.
Breeder licenses.

No person shall act as a breeder, as defined in §

4-19-2

, unless in possession of a valid license to operate as a breeder granted by the director. Application for that license shall be made in the manner provided by the director. The license period is the state’s fiscal year and the license fee is one hundred dollars ($100) for each license period or part thereof beginning with the first day of the fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 447, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 475, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1.

4-19-5.2.
Trainers required to obtain kennel license — Exceptions.

No person shall act as a trainer, as defined in §

4-19-2

, unless in possession of a valid kennel license as set forth in §

4-19-6

. Provided, however, persons engaged in dog training activities for dog training programs operated by government agencies, or operated by a not-for-profit or exempt nonprofit organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not be required by this section to obtain a kennel license.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 182, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 252, § 2.

4-19-6.
Public auction and kennel licenses.

No person shall operate a public auction or a kennel, as defined in this chapter, unless a license to operate that establishment has been granted by the director. Application for the license shall be made in the manner provided by the director. The license period is the fiscal year and the license fee shall be fifty dollars ($50.00) for each license period or part thereof beginning with the first day of the fiscal year.

This section shall not be interpreted to interfere in any manner with the issuing of a public auction or kennel license by any city or town, nor any fee charged by any city or town. No license shall be issued by the director except for those premises as shall be designated for the licensure by the respective city or town council.

Pursuant to §

4-19-2(19)

, any person who provides the sheltering, feeding, and watering in return for a fee in a residential setting of no more than four (4) animals not owned by the proprietor is:

Exempt from licensure as a kennel under this chapter; and

Subject to inspection by an authorized agent of the department of environmental management (hereinafter “the department”) upon the department receiving a written complaint against the person. Only complaints related to animal care, animal health, and animal welfare may initiate an inspection. Any inspection that is conducted by the department shall be conducted during the hours of eight o’clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) through five o’clock p.m. (5:00 p.m.), unless the person who is the subject of the complaint agrees to an inspection at another time; and

Required to be compliant with the department’s rules and regulations governing animal care facilities, RICR

250-RICR-40-05-4

, §§ 4.7 and 4.8.A.1 through 8 (excluding the sanitation log requirements of § 4.8.A.3). Any inspection conducted by an authorized agent of the department shall be limited to the aforementioned sections and shall be limited to areas to which the animals being cared for have access. Any violations of these sections are punishable in accordance with § 4.12 of the rules and regulations governing animal care facilities and any appeal for any enforcement action shall be made in accordance with § 4.11.B of those rules and regulations; and

Any person who is subject to inspection pursuant to the conditions set forth in subsection (c)(2), but who denies access to authorized inspectors from the department, is subject to a civil fine of three hundred fifty dollars ($350). Each day that access is denied shall constitute a separate punishable offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 33, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1.

4-19-7.
Dealer licenses.

No person shall operate as a dealer, as defined in this chapter, after the first day of the fiscal year unless a license to deal has been granted by the director to that person. Application for the license shall be made in the manner provided by the director. The license period is the fiscal year and the license fee is one hundred dollars ($100) for each license period or part thereof beginning with the first day of the fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1.

4-19-8.
Denial of certificates of registration or licenses.

A certificate of registration may be denied to any pound or animal shelter, rescue, or broker, and a license may be denied to any public auction, kennel, breeder, pet shop, trainer, or dealer or, if granted, the certificate or license may be revoked by the director if, after a hearing, it is determined that the housing facilities and/or primary enclosures are inadequate for the purposes of this chapter or if the feeding, watering, sanitizing, and housing practices at the pound, animal shelter, public auction, pet shop, or kennel are not consistent with the intent of this chapter or with the intent of the rules and regulations that may be promulgated pursuant to the authority of this chapter.

Upon revocation of a certificate of registration, all animals in the possession of the pound, rescue, broker, or animal shelter must be transferred to another licensed releasing agency for disposition.

Upon the revocation of a license, all animals in the possession of the public auction, kennel, pet shop, breeder, trainer, or dealer must be disposed of by the former licensee in a manner approved by the department. Such disposition must not be for profit and must occur in a timeframe that is determined by the department. Inspectors from the department or from the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals must have access to the facility where the animals being housed by the former licensee are being held until disposition so that the welfare of said animals can be assured.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 475, §; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 252, § 1.

4-19-9.
Operation as a pet shop, kennel, breeder or public auction without a license.

Any person who operates as a pet shop, kennel, breeder, or public auction without a currently valid license shall, upon conviction, plea of guilty, or plea of nolo contendere, be punished pursuant to §

4-19-11.3

. Each day of operation shall constitute a separate offense. Advertisement of services consistent with the operation of a pet shop, kennel, breeder, or public auction shall be sufficient evidence of operation of a pet shop, kennel, breeder, or public auction as applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 475, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 16.

4-19-10.
Dealing in animals without a license.

Any person who operates as a dealer of animals, as defined in this chapter, without a currently valid license shall, upon conviction, plea of guilty, or plea of nolo contendere, be punished pursuant to §

4-19-11.3

. Each day of operation shall constitute a separate offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1.

4-19-11.
Mistreatment of animals.

Failure of any person, firm, or corporation, licensed or registered, under the provisions of this chapter, to adequately house, feed, and water animals in his or her possession or custody, as delineated in any rules and regulations promulgated under the authority of this chapter, shall constitute a misdemeanor, and the person, firm, or corporation shall be subject to a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per animal; and forfeiture of the animal(s); and revocation of license and/or certificate after a public hearing. Any animals that are suspected of being mistreated may be seized by the state veterinarian to ensure adequate welfare pursuant to §

4-1-31(f)

with the cost of care for the aforementioned animals to be determined in the manner prescribed by that section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1.

4-19-11.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 164, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 278, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 13, 2005.

4-19-11.2.
Destruction of animals — Reporting.

All licensed releasing agencies are required to notify the department of environmental management monthly of the number of animals destroyed while those animals are in their care and custody.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1.

4-19-11.3.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation who or that violates any provision of this chapter, unless the penalty is otherwise stated in a specific subsection, is subject upon conviction, plea of guilty, or plea of nolo contendere to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense and not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second and subsequent offense and loss of animal(s) and revocation of license and/or certificate after a public hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1.

4-19-12.
Disposition of animals.

Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, it shall be unlawful to dispose of any animal by using a carbon monoxide chamber or gas chamber. All animals that must be disposed of by a municipal pound or shelter, the humane society, an animal shelter, rescue, pet shop, breeder, kennel, or any other entity that is required to be licensed or registered under this chapter must be disposed of by lethal injection. In the event of an emergency, if a licensed veterinarian cannot be secured without undue delay and, in the opinion of the animal-control officer, animal-control administrator, approved humane investigator, animal shelter employee, or agent of any other entity so required to be licensed under the provisions of this chapter, the animal is so severely injured, diseased, or suffering in such a manner the animal cannot otherwise be humanely destroyed in an expeditious manner, the animal may be destroyed by shooting; provided, that:

Maximum precaution is taken to minimize the animal’s suffering and to protect other persons and animals;

The animal is restrained in a humane manner;

Shooting is performed by highly skilled and trained personnel utilizing a weapon, ammunition of suitable caliber, and other characteristics, and proper placement of the shot to produce an instantaneous death by a single gunshot.

If any type of restraint or confinement is deemed necessary for the safety of those involved, or for efficiency in euthanizing the animal, it must be done in the most humane way possible to cause the least amount of additional stress to that animal.

No dog officer shall give or sell, or negotiate for the gift or sale, to a dealer or research facility of any animal that may come into his or her custody in the course of carrying out his or her official assignments.

No dog officer shall be granted a dealer’s license. Each application for a dealer’s license shall include a statement made under oath, that neither the applicant, nor any member or employee of the firm, partnership, or corporation making application, is a dog officer within the meaning of this chapter.

A dog officer, or other licensed releasing agency, upon taking custody of any animal in the course of his, her, or its official duties, shall immediately make a record of the matter in the manner prescribed by the director and the record shall include a description of the animal, including: color, breed, sex, reason for seizure, location of seizure, the owner’s name and address if known, and all license or other identification numbers if any. Complete information relating to the disposition of the animal, including compliance with the provisions of §§

4-19-16

and

4-19-18

and any legal actions taken to uphold and enforce this law, shall be added in the manner provided by the director immediately after disposition. The information shall be forwarded monthly to the department of environmental management.

This section shall not apply to any research laboratories or facilities of any hospital, college, or university within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 256, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 262, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 475, § 1.

4-19-12.1.
Public health exemptions.

Destruction of animals using gas shall be permitted only by state agencies for the protection of public health. In addition, companies permitted by the department of environmental management pursuant to §

20-1-18

shall also be exempt from this ban on the use of gas.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 256, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 262, § 4.

4-19-13.
Rules and regulations.

The director may, as he or she deems indicated and appropriate, promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the objectives and intent of this chapter for the purpose of carrying out those objectives and intent. Those rules and regulations may include, but are not limited to, provisions relating to humane transportation to and from registered or licensed premises, records of purchase and sale, identification of animals handled, primary enclosures, housing facilities, sanitation, euthanasia, ambient temperatures, feeding, watering, adequate veterinary medical care, disposition and voluntary surrender of animals at shelters with and without a request for disposition or destruction of the animal. He or she may, at his or her discretion, after public hearing, adopt in whole or in part, those portions of the rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of the United States department of agriculture pursuant to the provisions of the animal welfare act, 7 U.S.C. § 2131 et seq., which are consistent with the intent and purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 483, § 1.

4-19-14.
Chapter inapplicable.

This chapter does not apply to a place or establishment which is operated under the immediate supervision of a duly licensed veterinarian as a hospital where animals are harbored, boarded and cared for incidental to the treatment, prevention, or alleviation of disease processes during the routine practice of the profession of veterinary medicine except that, if animals are accepted by that place, establishment or hospital for the primary purpose of boarding in return for a fee, the place, establishment or hospital is subject to the kennel license provisions of this chapter and the regulations relating to the license which may be promulgated by the director. This chapter shall not apply to any dealer or research facility during the period that the dealer or research facility is in the possession of a valid license or registration granted by the secretary of agriculture pursuant to 7 U.S.C. § 2131 et seq. This chapter shall not apply to breeders, nor to hobby breeders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1.

4-19-15.
Access of inspectors to property.

Any authorized representative of the director, and the general agent of the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, has the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purposes of inspection and investigating conditions relating to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 46, § 1.

4-19-16.
Mandatory spaying and neutering of dogs and cats adopted from a licensed releasing agency.

No licensed releasing agency shall release, sell, trade, give away, exchange, adopt out, or otherwise transfer, with or without a fee, any dog or cat that has not been spayed or neutered unless the adopting party executes a written agreement with the licensed releasing agency to have the dog or cat spayed or neutered in accordance with subsections (a)(2) and (a)(3).

The licensed releasing agency is authorized to enter into a written adoption agreement with the adopting party provided that at the time of execution of the written agreement, the licensed releasing agency collect from the adopting party an amount equal to the cost to the licensed releasing agency for the spaying or neutering of the dog or cat to be adopted. The written agreement must include the dog or cat’s age, sex, and general description; the date the adoption agreement was executed; the date by which the licensed releasing agency anticipates that the dog or cat will be spayed or neutered; the date by which the adoptive party shall claim the dog or cat; the adopting party’s name, address, phone number, and signature; the licensed releasing agency’s name, address, phone number, and the dollar amount remitted to the licensed releasing agency for the cost of spaying or neutering the dog or cat.

After execution of the agreement, the licensed releasing agency shall cause the dog or cat to be spayed or neutered and, when medically fit, shall transfer custody of the dog or cat to the adopting party. Any dog or cat that is not claimed by the adoptive party within ten (10) days of the date enumerated in the written adoption agreement shall be considered unclaimed and may be offered for adoption to another party.

The following are exemptions from the provisions of subsection (a):

A licensed releasing agency returns a stray dog or cat to its owner.

A licensed releasing agency receives a written report from a licensed veterinarian stating that the life of the dog or cat would be jeopardized by the surgery and that this health condition is likely to be permanent.

A licensed releasing agency receives a written report from a licensed veterinarian stating that there is a temporary health condition, including sexual immaturity, which would make surgery life threatening to the dog or cat or impracticable, in which instance the licensed releasing agency shall enter into a written agreement for the spaying or neutering of the dog or cat upon resolution of the temporary health condition or the animal reaching maturity and shall collect from the adopting party an amount equal to the cost to the licensed releasing agency for the spaying or neutering of the dog or cat to be adopted. The licensed releasing agency may then allow the transfer of the dog or cat to the adopting party who shall return the dog or cat to the licensed releasing agency for spaying or neutering upon resolution of the temporary health condition or the animal reaching sexual maturity. The licensed releasing agency may grant the adopting party an appropriate extension of time in which to have the dog or cat spayed or neutered based on the veterinarian’s report.

A licensed releasing agency transfers a dog or cat to another licensed releasing agency.

If requested to do so, a licensed releasing agency shall refund fees collected for the purpose of spaying or neutering the dog or cat to the adopting party upon reasonable proof being presented to the releasing agency by the adopting party that the dog or cat died before the spaying or neutering was required to be completed.

Any and all licensed releasing agencies:

May enter into cooperative agreements with each other and with veterinarians in carrying out this section; and

Shall make a good faith effort to cause an adopting party to comply with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 24, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 145, § 1.

4-19-17.
Forfeited fees.

Upon request, the adoptive party shall receive a refund for the fee collected by the licensed releasing agency under the provisions of subsection

4-19-16(a)

provided that the licensed releasing agency has not caused the dog or cat to be spayed or neutered at the time the request for such refund is made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 24, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 417, § 1.